Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 28.11
The Rhode Island Cannabis Act

21-28.11-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as “The Rhode Island Cannabis Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-2.
Organizational structure.

The regulation, licensing, and enforcement requirements pertaining to regulated cannabis establishments shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions of this chapter by virtue of an independent three (3) member commission which shall exercise all powers necessary for the implementation, administration and enforcement of cannabis regulation and policy for both medical and adult use cannabis.

The commission shall work in conjunction with the cannabis advisory board which shall provide advice, recommendations and proposals to the commission relative to the equitable administration and regulation of cannabis, including the distribution of funds from the social equity assistance fund pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

Additionally, pursuant to the provisions of this chapter following the final issuance of the commission’s rules and regulations, there shall be established the “cannabis office” which shall provide administrative and other support to the commission subject to this chapter and the rules and regulations promulgated by the commission pursuant hereto.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-3.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, the following words, terms and phrases shall have the following meanings:

“Administrator” means the administrator of the cannabis office appointed by the governor pursuant to the provisions of §

21-28.11-18.1

.

“Adult use cannabis” or “recreational cannabis” means cannabis which may be legally possessed and consumed for non-medical purposes by a person who is at least twenty-one (21) years of age.

“Applicant” means a Rhode Island resident or a business entity with a principal place of business located in Rhode Island to include, but not limited to, a corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership or partnership, and in which fifty-one percent (51%) of the equity in the business entity is owned by residents of Rhode Island, and the Rhode Island resident or business entity has made application for issuance of a license or certificate to own or engage in a cannabis business subject to the provisions of this chapter.

“Cannabinoid’' means any of several compounds produced by cannabis plants that have medical and psychotropic effects.

“Cannabinoid profile” means amounts, expressed as the dry-weight percentages, of delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol, cannabidiol, tetrahydrocannabinolic acid and cannabidiolic acid in a cannabis product. Amounts of other cannabinoids may be regulated by the commission.

“Cannabis” or “marijuana” or “marihuana” means all parts of any plant of the genus cannabis not excepted herein, and whether growing or not; the seeds thereof; and resin extracted from any part of the plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture or preparation of the plant, its seeds or resin including tetrahydrocannabinol; provided, however, that “cannabis” shall not include:

The mature stalks of the plant, fiber produced from the stalks, oil, or cake made from the seeds of the plant, any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture or preparation of the mature stalks, fiber, oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant or the sterilized seed of the plant that is incapable of germination;

Hemp; or

The weight of any other ingredient combined with cannabis to prepare topical or oral administrations, food, drink or other products.

“Cannabis accessories” or “marijuana accessories” means equipment, products, devices or materials of any kind that are intended or designed for use in planting, propagating, cultivating, growing, harvesting, manufacturing, compounding, converting, producing, processing, preparing, testing, analyzing, packaging, repackaging, storing, containing, ingesting, inhaling or otherwise introducing cannabis into the human body.

“Cannabis advisory board” or “advisory board” means the cannabis advisory board established pursuant to the provisions of §

21-28.11-6

.

“Cannabis concentrate” means the resin extracted from any part of the plant of the genus cannabis and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture or preparation of that resin but shall not include the weight of any other ingredient combined with cannabis to prepare cannabis products.

“Cannabis control commission” or “commission” means the Rhode Island cannabis control commission established by §

21-28.11-4

.

“Cannabis cultivator” or “marijuana cultivator” means an entity licensed to cultivate, process and package cannabis, to deliver cannabis to cannabis establishments and to transfer cannabis to other cannabis establishments, but not to consumers.

“Cannabis establishment” or “marijuana establishment” means a cannabis cultivator, cannabis testing laboratory, cannabis product manufacturer, cannabis retailer, hybrid cannabis retailer or any other type of licensed cannabis-related business.

“Cannabis office” means the office established pursuant to §

21-28.11-18.1

.

“Cannabis product manufacturer” or “marijuana product manufacturer”' means an entity licensed to obtain, manufacture, process and package cannabis and cannabis products, to deliver cannabis and cannabis products to cannabis establishments and to transfer cannabis and cannabis products to other cannabis establishments, but not to consumers.

“Cannabis products” or “marijuana products” means products that have been manufactured and contain cannabis or an extract from cannabis, including concentrated forms of cannabis and products composed of cannabis and other ingredients that are intended for use or consumption, including edible products, beverages, topical products, ointments, oils and tinctures.

“Cannabis retailer” or “marijuana retailer” means an entity licensed pursuant to §

21-28.11-10.2

to purchase and deliver cannabis and cannabis products from cannabis establishments and to deliver, sell or otherwise transfer cannabis and cannabis products to cannabis establishments and to consumers.

“Cannabis testing laboratory’' means a third-party analytical testing laboratory that is licensed annually by the commission, in consultation with the department of health, to collect and test samples of cannabis and cannabis products pursuant to regulations issued by the commission and is:

Independent financially from any medical cannabis treatment center or any licensee or cannabis establishment for which it conducts a test; and

Qualified to test cannabis in compliance with regulations promulgated by the commission pursuant to this chapter. The term includes, but is not limited to, a cannabis testing laboratory as provided in §

21-28.11-11

.

“Chairperson” means the chairperson of the cannabis control commission established pursuant to §

21-28.11-4

.

“Close associate” means a person who holds a legally recognized financial interest in, or is entitled to exercise power in, the business of an applicant or licensee and, by virtue of that interest or power, is able to exercise a significant influence over the management or operation of a cannabis establishment licensed under this chapter.

“Consumer” means a person who is at least twenty-one (21) years of age, and who is authorized by law to consume or use cannabis.

“Controlling person” means an officer, board member or other individual who has a financial or voting interest of ten percent (10%) or greater in a cannabis establishment.

“Cultivation batch” means a collection of cannabis plants from the same seed or plant stock that are cultivated and harvested together, and receive an identical propagation and cultivation treatment, including, but not limited to: growing media, ambient conditions, watering and light regimes and agricultural or hydroponic inputs. Every cannabis cultivator licensee shall assign and record a unique, sequential alphanumeric identifier to each cultivation batch for the purposes of production tracking, product labeling and product recalls.

“Disproportionately impacted area” means a census tract or comparable geographic area that satisfies at least one of the following criteria as determined by the commission, that:

The area has a poverty rate of at least twenty percent (20%) according to the latest federal decennial census;

Seventy-five percent (75%) or more of the children in the area participate in the federal free lunch program according to reported statistics from the Rhode Island board of education;

At least twenty percent (20%) of the households in the area receive assistance under the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP);

The area has an average unemployment rate, as determined by the Rhode Island department of labor and training, that is more than one hundred twenty percent (120%) of the national unemployment average, as determined by the United States Department of Labor, for a period of at least two (2) consecutive calendar years preceding the date of the application; or

The area has disproportionately high rates of arrest, conviction, and incarceration related to the sale, possession, use, cultivation, manufacture, or transportation of cannabis in comparison to other communities and localities in the state; or

The area has a history of arrests, convictions, and other law enforcement practices in a certain geographic area, such as, but not limited to, precincts, zip codes, neighborhoods, and political subdivisions, reflecting a disparate enforcement of cannabis prohibition during a certain time period, when compared to the remainder of the state.

The commission shall, with recommendations from the cannabis advisory board and the chief equity officer, issue guidelines to determine how to assess which communities have been disproportionately impacted and how to assess if someone is a member of a community disproportionately impacted.

“Final issuance of the commission’s rules and regulations” means the rules and regulations adopted by the commission after compliance with requirements of chapter 35 of title 42 (the “administrative procedures act”) and chapter 46 of title 42 (the “open meetings act”) and shall not include any emergency, provisional or interim rules, regulations, requirements, orders, instructions or procedures.

“Finished cannabis” means a usable cannabis, cannabis resin or cannabis concentrate.

“Hemp” means the plant of the genus cannabis or any part of the plant, whether growing or not, with a delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol concentration that does not exceed three tenths of one percent (0.3%) on a dry weight basis of any part of the plant of the genus cannabis, or per volume or weight of cannabis product, or the combined per cent of delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol and tetrahydrocannabinolic acid in any part of the plant of the genus cannabis regardless of moisture content.

“Host community” means a municipality in which a cannabis establishment or a medical cannabis treatment center is located or in which an applicant has proposed locating a cannabis establishment or a medical cannabis treatment center.

“Hybrid cannabis retailer” or “hybrid compassion center” means a compassion center licensed pursuant to chapter 28.6 of this title that is in good standing with the department of business regulation and that has paid the fee pursuant to §

21-28.11-10

and has been authorized to sell non-medical or adult use cannabis to consumers.

“Laboratory agent” means a registered employee of a cannabis testing laboratory who transports, possesses or tests cannabis.

“Licensee” means a person or entity licensed by the commission pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. Any business structure recognized under title 7, including, but not limited to, corporations, partnerships, limited partnerships, limited-liability companies, and workers’ cooperatives, which is otherwise qualified, is eligible to be considered by the commission as an entity licensee.

“Manufacture” means to compound, blend, extract, infuse or otherwise make or prepare a cannabis product.

“Medical cannabis” means cannabis and cannabis products that satisfy the requirements of chapter 28.6 of this title and have been given the designation of “medical cannabis” or “medical marijuana” due to dose, potency and form. Medical cannabis products are only available for use by patient cardholders, and may only be sold to or possessed by patient cardholders, or their registered caregiver, or authorized purchaser in accordance with chapter 28.6 of this title. Medical cannabis may not be sold to, possessed by, manufactured by, or used by any person except as permitted pursuant to chapter 28.6 of this title.

“Medical cannabis treatment center” or “Medical marijuana treatment center” includes a compassion center, a medical marijuana emporium, or marijuana establishment licensee who operates a treatment center, as defined in §

21-28.6-3

.

“Member of an impacted family” means an individual who has a parent, legal guardian, child, spouse, or dependent, or was a dependent of an individual who, prior to the effective date of this chapter, was arrested for, charged with, convicted of, or adjudicated delinquent for any offense that is eligible for expungement under this chapter.

“Ownership and control” means ownership of at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the cannabis establishment, and control over the management and day-to-day operations of the cannabis establishment, and an interest in the capital, assets, and profits and losses of the cannabis establishment proportionate to percentage of ownership.

“Process” or “processing” means to harvest, dry, cure, trim and separate parts of the cannabis plant by manual or mechanical means, except it shall not include manufacture as defined in this section.

“Production batch” means a batch of finished plant material, cannabis resin, cannabis concentrate or cannabis-infused product made at the same time, using the same methods, equipment and ingredients. The commission shall require licensees to assign and record a unique, sequential alphanumeric identifier to each production batch for the purposes of production tracking, product labeling and product recalls. All production batches shall be traceable to one or more cannabis cultivation batches.

“Residual solvent” means a volatile organic chemical used in the manufacture of a cannabis product and that is not completely removed by practical manufacturing techniques.

“Social equity applicant” means an applicant that has been disproportionately impacted by criminal enforcement of marijuana laws, including individuals convicted of nonviolent marijuana offenses, immediate family members of individuals convicted of nonviolent marijuana offenses and individuals who have resided in disproportionately impacted areas for at least five (5) of the last ten (10) years, as determined by the commission after consultation with the cannabis advisory board, and further specified in the rules and regulations that shall identify factors and other considerations to be evaluated in certifying applicants as social equity applicants, provided that such applicants shall at a minimum meet one of the following criteria:

An applicant with at least fifty-one percent (51%) ownership and control by one or more individuals who have resided for at least five (5) of the preceding ten (10) years in a disproportionately impacted area.

An applicant with at least fifty-one percent (51%) ownership and control by one or more individuals who:

Have been arrested for, convicted of, or adjudicated delinquent for any offense that is eligible for expungement under this chapter; or

Is a member of an impacted family.

For applicants with a minimum of ten (10) full-time employees, an applicant with at least fifty-one percent (51%) of current employees who:

Currently reside in a disproportionately impacted area; or

Have been arrested for, convicted of, or adjudicated delinquent for any offense that is eligible for expungement under this chapter or is a member of an impacted family.

Can demonstrate significant past experience in or business practices that promote economic empowerment in disproportionally impacted areas.

Had income which does not exceed four hundred percent (400%) of the median income, as defined by the commission, in a disproportionally impacted area for at least five (5) of the past ten (10) years.

“Terpenoid” means an isoprene that are the aromatic compounds found in cannabis, including, but not limited to: limonene, myrcene, pinene, linalool, eucalyptol, Δ-terpinene, ß-caryophyllene, caryophyllene oxide, nerolidol and phytol.

“Unreasonable and impracticable” means that the measures necessary to comply with the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter subject licensees to unreasonable risk or require such a high investment of money, time or any other resource or asset that a reasonably prudent businessperson would not operate a cannabis establishment.

“Workers’ cooperative” means an applicant organized and operated pursuant to the provisions of chapter 6.2 of title 7.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-4.
Cannabis control commission.

Establishment of commission. There is hereby established an independent commission known as the Rhode Island Cannabis Control Commission (commission). The purpose of the commission is to oversee the regulation, licensing and control of adult use and medical cannabis and upon transfer of powers pursuant to the provisions of §

21-28.11-10.1

, to exercise primary responsibility to oversee the regulation, licensing and control of all cannabis and marijuana use to include medical marijuana.

Appointment of commissioners. The Rhode Island Cannabis Control Commission shall consist of three (3) voting commissioners as follows:

The governor shall appoint, with the advice and consent of the senate, the three (3) voting members of the commission. The speaker of the house shall, within thirty (30) days of the effective date of this chapter, submit to the governor a list of three (3) individuals that the governor shall give due consideration in appointing one individual from this list. The governor shall appoint the other two (2) commissioners without regard to the list submitted by the speaker of the house. The governor shall designate one of the members to serve as chairperson of the commission. Within forty (40) days of the effective date of this chapter, the governor shall submit to the senate for advice and consent the list of three (3) individuals for appointment to the commission along with the governor’s designation of chairperson.

Prior to appointment to the commission, a background investigation shall be conducted into the financial stability, integrity and responsibility of each appointee, including the appointee’s reputation for good character, and honesty. No commissioner or commissioner’s spouse, or child shall have any interest whatsoever in any entity regulated by the commission.

Commissioner requirements. Each commissioner shall be a resident of the state within ninety (90) days of appointment, and while serving on the commission, shall not:

Hold, or be a candidate for, federal, state or local elected office;

Hold an appointed office or other employment in a federal, state or local government; or

Serve as an official in a political party.

Term Limits. Term limits on the initial commissioners shall be as follows: The appointee chosen after consideration of the list provided to the governor by the speaker of the house shall serve an initial term of three (3) years and shall be eligible for reappointment in accordance with this section. Of the appointees chosen by the governor without regard to the list submitted by the speaker of the house, one shall serve an initial term of two (2) years, and one shall serve an initial term of one year and both shall be eligible for reappointment in accordance with this section.

Each initial commissioner is eligible for reappointment for one six (6) year term or until a successor is appointed. Each subsequent commissioner shall serve for a term of six (6) years or until a successor is appointed. Every person appointed or reappointed to fill a vacancy on the cannabis control commission shall be appointed in the manner established pursuant to this section.

If a vacancy is created prior to the expiration of any commissioner’s term, said vacancy shall be filled in the manner established pursuant to this section. Any person appointed to fill said vacancy shall complete the commissioner’s unexpired term and shall then be eligible for reappointment for one additional term pursuant to this section.

Compensation. The chairperson of the commission shall devote their full time attention to the duties of the commission. Upon confirmation, the chairperson shall become a state employee and shall receive a salary as determined by the governor subject to appropriation by the general assembly. The remaining commissioners shall not be state employees but shall receive a monthly stipend as determined by the governor, subject to appropriation by the general assembly, and shall devote sufficient time and attention to the commission to adequately perform their duties.

Records. The commission shall keep a record of the proceedings of the commission and the chair shall be the custodian and keeper of the records of all books, documents and papers filed by the commission and of its minute book. The chair shall cause copies to be made of all minutes and other records and documents of the commission and shall certify that such copies are true copies and all persons dealing with the commission may rely upon such certification. These records shall also be subject to the provisions of title 38, “public records.” The chair shall have and exercise supervision and control over all the affairs of the commission. The chair shall preside at all hearings at which the chair is present and shall designate a commissioner to act as chair in the chair’s absence. To promote efficiency in administration, the chair shall make such division or re-division of the work of the commission among the commissioners, as the chair deems expedient.

Conduct of hearings. The commissioners shall, if so directed by the chair, participate in the hearing and decision of any matter before the commission.

For purposes of this section, “formal matter”, as so designated by the chair, shall include all non-procedural matters to include, but not limited to, hearings subject to the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42 (the “administrative procedures act”) and all decisions relative to the awarding of a license or to the denial or revocation of licenses. A majority of the commissioners is required to hear and approve all formal matters.

For purposes of this section, “procedural matters”, as so designated by the chair, include scheduling, inclusion of agenda items, administrative compliance decisions, ministerial matters, routine clerical functions, and any other act delegated by the commission to be performed by an employee of the commission or the cannabis office. Any procedural or administrative matter may be heard, examined and investigated by a single commissioner or an employee of the commission or the cannabis office as designated and assigned by the chair, with the concurrence of one other commissioner. If designated by the commission or the cannabis office, the designated employee shall make a report in writing relative to the hearing, examination and investigation of every procedural or administrative matter. For the purposes of hearing, examining and investigating any procedural or administrative matter, the designated employee shall have all of the powers conferred upon a commissioner by this section. Any procedural or administrative decision made by a single commissioner or designated employee may be appealed within ten (10) days of issuance of the decision for a hearing before the full commission.

Ethics. The provisions of chapter 14 of title 36, the state code of ethics, shall apply to the commissioners and to employees operating under the jurisdiction of the commission to include, but not limited to, personnel of the cannabis office; provided, however, that the commission may promulgate an internal code of ethics for all members and employees that may be more restrictive than the provisions of chapter 14 of title 36. A copy of any internal code of ethics adopted or as amended shall be filed with the state ethics commission. The internal code may include provisions reasonably necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

Public body. The cannabis control commission shall be a public body for the purposes of chapter 46 of title 42 (the “open meetings act”).

Finance. The commission shall, for the purposes of compliance with state finance law, and subject to appropriation by the general assembly, operate as an independent state agency and shall be subject to the laws applicable to agencies under the control of the governor; provided, however, that the chairperson may identify any additional instructions or actions necessary for the department of administration to manage fiscal operations in the state accounting system and meet statewide and other governmental accounting and audit standards. The commission shall properly classify the commission’s operating and capital expenditures, and shall not include any salaries of employees in the commission’s capital expenditures. Unless otherwise exempted by law, the commission shall participate in any other available state administrative services including, but not limited to, the state payroll system, the state retirement system, and state purchases.

Prohibition on discrimination. The commission and all personnel and employees operating under the jurisdiction of the commission to include, but not limited to, personnel of the cannabis office, shall not unlawfully discriminate by considering race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, national origin, or disability in granting, denying, or revoking a license, nor shall any person, corporation, or business firm which is licensed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter unlawfully discriminate against or segregate any person based on these grounds. All businesses licensed by the commission shall operate on a nondiscriminatory basis, according to equal employment treatment and access to their services to all persons, unless otherwise exempted by the laws of the state. Any licensee who fails to comply with this policy is subject to any disciplinary action that is consistent with the legal authority and rules and regulations of the commission. The commission shall cooperate with the state equal opportunity office to prevent any person, corporation, or business firm from unlawfully discriminating because of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, national origin, or disability or from participating in any practice which may have a disparate effect on any protected class within the population. The state equal opportunity office shall monitor the equal employment opportunity activities and affirmative action plans of the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.